Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 22 Powers

34-22-1.
Disclaimer and renunciation or restriction of power.

A person to whom any power of appointment, or power of apportionment, or any other power, whether coupled with an interest or not, is given, may disclaim or renounce the whole, or any part, of that power to the extent that the power has not been exercised by that person, and may also restrict any such power, either as to persons to whom he or she may appoint or the amounts he or she may appoint, or both. The disclaimer or renunciation shall relate back to the creation of the power and shall take and have effect as of that time. No title to any property or interest with respect to which such renunciation or disclaimer is made shall pass to any person by virtue of the power to the extent of the renunciation or disclaimer, and the power shall be void to the extent of the renunciation or disclaimer. After such disclaimer or renunciation, the power may be exercised by the other or others, if any, or the survivors or survivor of the others, of the persons to whom the power is given, unless the contrary is expressed in the instrument creating the power. This section shall apply to all powers of appointment and powers of apportionment and all other powers, whether created before or after the original enactment of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 208, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 259, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 303, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1486, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-1

.

34-22-2.
Delivery and recording of disclaimer and renunciation.

Any renunciation or disclaimer shall be valid and effective according to its terms when signed by the person disclaiming or renouncing the power and delivered to any other person having any legal or equitable interest, vested or contingent, in the property subject to the power; provided, however, that if the property, or any part thereof, shall consist of real estate situated in this state, the disclaimer or renunciation shall not take effect with respect to the real estate unless and until the renunciation or disclaimer shall be acknowledged and recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city in which the real estate, or some part thereof, is situated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1486, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-2

.

34-22-3.
Release of power — Contract not to exercise.

A person to whom any power, whether or not coupled with an interest, is given, may release, or contract not to exercise, the power, unless prevented from so doing by the terms of the power.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 22; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-3

.

34-22-4.
Means of releasing or contracting not to exercise power.

Any power of appointment or power of apportionment or any other power, whether or not coupled with an interest, unless it is otherwise expressly provided by the terms of the power, may be released in whole or in part by the donee or donees of the power, or the donee or donees of the power may contract not to exercise the power in whole or in part. After the release or contract, the power may be exercised by the other or others, if any, or the survivors or survivor of the others, of the persons to whom the power is given, unless the contrary is expressed in the instrument creating the power. This section shall apply to all powers of appointment and powers of apportionment and all other powers, whether created before or after the original enactment of this section. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the release or contract shall be valid and effective according to its terms when signed by the releasor, or by the contracting party, as the case may be, and delivered to any other person having any legal or equitable interest, vested or contingent, in the property subject to the power; provided, however, that if the property, or any part thereof, shall consist of real estate situated in this state, the release or contract shall not take effect with respect to the real estate unless and until the release or contract shall be acknowledged and recorded in the records of land evidence in the town or city in which the real estate, or some part thereof, is situated.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 5; P.L. 1943, ch. 1348, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1486, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-4

.

34-22-5.
Relationship between §§ 34-22-3 and 34-22-4.

The general assembly hereby declares that §

34-22-4

is declaratory of the meaning of §

34-22-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1944, ch. 1486, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-5

.

34-22-6.
Acts under power of attorney.

The donee of a power of attorney may, under and within the authority of the power, if he or she thinks fit, execute or do any assurance, instrument, or thing in and with his or her own name and signature, and, where sealing is required, with his or her own seal; and every assurance, instrument and thing so executed and done shall be as effectual in law, to all intents, as if it had been executed or done by the donee of the power in the name and with the signature, or signature and seal, of the donor thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-6

.

34-22-6.1.
When power of attorney not affected by incompetency.

Whenever a donor of a power of attorney designates another his or her attorney in fact or agent by a power of attorney in writing and the writing contains the words “This power of attorney shall not be affected by the incompetency of the donor”, or “This power of attorney shall become effective upon the incompetency of the donor”, or similar words showing the intent of the donor that the authority conferred is exercisable notwithstanding the donor’s incompetency, the authority of the attorney in fact or agent is exercisable as provided in the power on behalf of the donor notwithstanding later incompetency of the donor at law or later uncertainty as to whether the donor is dead or alive, and unless it states a time of termination, the authority conferred remains exercisable notwithstanding the lapse of time since the execution of the instrument. All acts done by the attorney in fact or agent pursuant to the power during any period of incompetence or uncertainty as to whether the donor is dead or alive have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the donor or the donor’s heirs, devisees, and personal representative as if the donor were alive and competent. If a guardian or conservator subsequently is appointed for the donor, the attorney in fact or agent, during the continuance of the appointment, accounts to the guardian or conservator rather than the donor. The guardian or conservator has the same power the donor would have had if the donor were not incompetent to revoke, suspend, or terminate all or any part of the power of attorney or agency.

Any person who acts in good faith reliance on a power of attorney, whether such power is authorized pursuant to subsection (a) of this section or is otherwise valid on its face, shall incur no liability as a result of acting in accordance with the instructions of the attorney in fact or agent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 322, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

34-22-7.
Good faith payment by attorney acting under invalid power.

Any person, making any payment in good faith in pursuance of a power of attorney, shall not be liable, in respect of the payment, by reason that before the payment the donor of the power had died or become of unsound mind or bankrupt, or had revoked the power, if the fact of death, unsoundness of mind, bankruptcy or revocation, was not at the time of the payment known to the person making the payment. This section shall not affect any right against the payee of any person interested in any money so paid; and that person shall have the like remedy against the payee as he or she would have had against the payer if the payment had not been made.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 202, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 253, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 297, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 488, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-7

; P.L. 1999, ch. 83, § 79; P.L. 1999, ch. 130, § 79.

34-22-8.
Power of attorney given by member of military in time of war.

Any person seventeen (17) years old or over may give a power of attorney to be exercised during the period during which the donor is engaged in active service with the military, air, or naval forces of the United States or in the American merchant marine during any war, declared or undeclared, in which the United States shall be engaged. The power of attorney shall continue in full force and effect until revoked by the donor or by operation of law. The donee of the power of attorney may act for and represent the donor to the extent as authorized in the power of attorney, provided that nothing in §§

34-22-8

—

34-22-10

shall authorize a donee of a power of attorney given by a minor to sell, mortgage or dispose of the property, real or personal, of the minor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2644, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

33-22-8

.

34-22-9.
Good faith acts under revoked military member’s power of attorney.

Notwithstanding the revocation of any power of attorney given by a member of the military, whether by act of the donor of the power or by operation of law, any act done or instrument executed by the donee of the power shall be as valid and effectual in favor of any person dealing with the donee as if the power had remained unrevoked at the time when the act was done or the instrument was executed unless the person dealing with the donee had at that time actual notice of the revocation of the power.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch 2644, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-9

.

34-22-10.
Notice of death of member of military giving power of attorney.

No person shall be deemed for the purposes of §§

34-22-8

and

34-22-9

to have actual notice of the death of any donor of any power of attorney given by a member of the military by reason only of a report to the effect that the donor is missing or is missing and believed to be killed, unless the death of the donor has been presumed by order of a court of competent jurisdiction and the person in question has notice of the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1950 (s. s.), ch. 2644, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-22-10

.

34-22-11.
Construction of certain powers of appointment created before May 1, 1958.

In the construction of any will of a person who dies, or of a deed of trust executed and becoming effective before May 1, 1958, which instrument shall create a power to appoint by will, unlimited as to the persons to whom the donee of the power may appoint, the instrument shall be deemed to permit appointment to the estate of the donee of the power unless a contrary intention shall appear by the terms thereof, or unless the donee of the power shall have deceased prior to May 1, 1958.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 54, § 1.

34-22-12.
Construction of certain powers of appointment created after May 1, 1958.

In the construction of any will of a person who dies, or of a deed of trust executed and becoming effective after May 1, 1958, which instrument shall create a power to appoint by will, unlimited as to the persons to whom the donee of the power may appoint, the instrument shall be deemed to permit appointment to the estate of the donee of the power unless a contrary intention shall appear by the terms thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 54, § 1.

34-22-13.
Powers as subjecting property to creditors.

Except to the extent that a donee shall appoint to his or her estate or to his or her creditors, §§

34-22-11

and

34-22-12

shall not be construed to subject to the claims of creditors of the donee the property which the donee is authorized to appoint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 54, § 1.

34-22-14.
Severability of §§ 34-22-11 — 34-22-14.

The provisions of §§

34-22-11

—

34-22-14

are hereby declared to be severable; and in case any part, section or provision of §§

34-22-11

—

34-22-14

are held invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the remaining parts, sections and provisions of §§ 34-22-11 — 34-22-14 shall not be thereby impaired or otherwise affected and the other parts, sections and provisions shall be given effect without the invalid provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1958, ch. 54, § 1.